Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8401
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that medical records contain personal and sensitive information that if improperly used or released may do significant harm to a patient's interests. Patients need access to their own medical records as a matter of fairness to enable them to make informed decisions about their health care and correct inaccurate or incomplete information about themselves.

Laws 1999, LB 17, § 1.